Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.0331

Amusement games authorized—Minimum rules.

The legislature hereby authorizes any person to conduct or operate amusement games when licensed and operated pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and rules and regulations adopted by the commission at such locations as the commission may authorize. The rules shall provide for at least the following:

(1) Persons other than bona fide charitable or bona fide nonprofit organizations shall conduct amusement games only after obtaining a special amusement game license from the commission.

(2) Amusement games may be conducted under such a license only as a part of, and upon the site of:

(a) Any agricultural fair as authorized under chapter 15.76 or 36.37 RCW; or

(b) A civic center of a county, city, or town; or

(c) A world's fair or similar exposition that is approved by the bureau of international expositions at Paris, France; or

(d) A community-wide civic festival held not more than once annually and sponsored or approved by the city, town, or county in which it is held; or

(e) A commercial exposition organized and sponsored by an organization or association representing the retail sales and service operators conducting business in a shopping center or other commercial area developed and operated for retail sales and service, but only upon a parking lot or similar area located in said shopping center or commercial area for a period of no more than seventeen consecutive days by any licensee during any calendar year; or

(f) An amusement park. An amusement park is a group of activities, at a permanent location, to which people go to be entertained through a combination of various mechanical or aquatic rides, theatrical productions, motion picture, and/or slide show presentations with food and drink service. The amusement park must include at least five different mechanical, or aquatic rides, three additional activities, and the gross receipts must be primarily from these amusement activities; or

(g) Within a regional shopping center. A regional shopping center is a shopping center developed and operated for retail sales and service by retail sales and service operators and consisting of more than six hundred thousand gross square feet not including parking areas. Amusement games conducted as a part of, and upon the site of, a regional shopping center shall not be subject to the prohibition on revenue sharing set forth in RCW 9.46.120(2); or

(h) A location that possesses a valid license from the Washington *state liquor control board and prohibits minors on their premises; or

(i) Movie theaters, bowling alleys, miniature golf course facilities, and amusement centers. For the purposes of this section an amusement center shall be defined as a permanent location whose primary source of income is from the operation of ten or more amusement devices; or

(j) Any business whose primary activity is to provide food service for on-premises consumption and who offers family entertainment which includes at least three of the following activities: Amusement devices; theatrical productions; mechanical rides; motion pictures; and slide show presentations; or

(k) Other locations as the commission may authorize.

(3) No amusement games may be conducted in any location except in conformance with local zoning, fire, health, and similar regulations. In no event may the licensee conduct any amusement games at any of the locations set out in subsection (2) of this section without first having obtained the written permission to do so from the person or organization owning the premises or an authorized agent thereof, and from the persons sponsoring the fair, exhibition, commercial exhibition, or festival, or from the city or town operating the civic center, in connection with which the games are to be operated.

(4) In no event may a licensee conduct any amusement games at the location described in subsection (2)(g) of this section, without, at the location of such games, providing adult supervision during all hours the licensee is open for business at such location, prohibiting school-age minors from entry during school hours, maintaining full-time personnel whose responsibilities include maintaining security and daily machine maintenance, and providing for hours for the close of business at such location that are no later than 10:00 p.m. on Fridays and Saturdays and on all other days that are the same as those of the regional shopping center in which the licensee is located.

(5) In no event may a licensee conduct any amusement game at a location described in subsection (2)(i) or (j) of this section, without, at the location of such games, providing adult supervision during all hours the licensee is open for business at such location, prohibiting school-age minors from playing licensed amusement games during school hours, maintaining full-time personnel whose responsibilities include maintaining security and daily machine maintenance, and prohibiting minors from playing the amusement games after 10:00 p.m. on any day.

[ 2009 c 78 s 1; 1991 c 287 s 1; 1987 c 4 s 30. Formerly RCW 9.46.030(5).]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "state liquor control board" was renamed the "state liquor and cannabis board" by 2015 c 70 s 3.